Kentucky statutes. TITLE II Legislative Branch
Senatorial Districts
5.137.
Thirty-seventh Senatorial District.

The Thirty-seventh Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Jefferson KY (part)

A105 - Precinct 105 28 District

A107 - Precinct 107 28 District

A108 - Precinct 108 28 District

A111 - Precinct 111 28 District

A113 - Precinct 113 28 District

A114 - Precinct 114 28 District

A115 - Precinct 115 28 District

A123 - Precinct 123 28 District

A124 - Precinct 124 28 District

A125 - Precinct 125 28 District

A126 - Precinct 126 28 District

A128 - Precinct 128 28 District

A131 - Precinct 131 28 District

A136 - Precinct 136 28 District

A141 - Precinct 141 28 District

I107 - Precinct 107 37 District

I109 - Precinct 109 37 District

I110 - Precinct 110 37 District

I111 - Precinct 111 37 District

I112 - Precinct 112 37 District

I115 - Precinct 115 37 District

I120 - Precinct 120 37 District

I140 - Precinct 140 37 District

J101 - Precinct 101 38 District

J104 - Precinct 104 38 District

J105 - Precinct 105 38 District

J107 - Precinct 107 38 District

J108 - Precinct 108 38 District

J111 - Precinct 111 38 District

J113 - Precinct 113 38 District

J114 - Precinct 114 38 District

J117 - Precinct 117 38 District

J119 - Precinct 119 38 District

J120 - Precinct 120 38 District

J122 - Precinct 122 38 District

J123 - Precinct 123 38 District (part)

211110120031000, 211110120031009, 211110120031010, 211110120031011, 211110120031019, 211110120034000, 211110120034001, 211110120034002, 211110120034003, 211110120034004, 211110120034005, 211110120034006, 211110120034007, 211110120034008, 211110120034012

Click to view

J130 - Precinct 130 38 District

J135 - Precinct 135 38 District

J137 - Precinct 137 38 District

J140 - Precinct 140 38 District

J142 - Precinct 142 38 District

J143 - Precinct 143 38 District

J144 - Precinct 144 38 District

J145 - Precinct 145 38 District

J146 - Precinct 146 38 District

J147 - Precinct 147 38 District

J148 - Precinct 148 38 District

J149 - Precinct 149 38 District

J150 - Precinct 150 38 District

J151 - Precinct 151 38 District

J154 - Precinct 154 38 District

K111 - Precinct 111 40 District

K114 - Precinct 114 40 District

K117 - Precinct 117 40 District

K118 - Precinct 118 40 District

K119 - Precinct 119 40 District

K125 - Precinct 125 40 District

K126 - Precinct 126 40 District

K127 - Precinct 127 40 District

K128 - Precinct 128 40 District

K132 - Precinct 132 40 District

K137 - Precinct 137 40 District (part)

211110039002011, 211110039002012, 211110043013003, 211110043013004, 211110043013005, 211110043013006

Click to view

K138 - Precinct 138 40 District

K139 - Precinct 139 40 District

K143 - Precinct 143 40 District

K144 - Precinct 144 40 District

K145 - Precinct 145 40 District

K146 - Precinct 146 40 District

K147 - Precinct 147 40 District

K148 - Precinct 148 40 District

K151 - Precinct 151 40 District

O114 - Precinct 114 44 District

O115 - Precinct 115 44 District

O124 - Precinct 124 44 District

O126 - Precinct 126 44 District

O127 - Precinct 127 44 District

O128 - Precinct 128 44 District

O129 - Precinct 129 44 District

O130 - Precinct 130 44 District

O131 - Precinct 131 44 District

O136 - Precinct 136 44 District

O137 - Precinct 137 44 District

O138 - Precinct 138 44 District

O143 - Precinct 143 44 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 37, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
37, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
37, effective January 11, 1996; 2000, ch. 325, § 2, effective June 15, 2000; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 137, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 37, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 37, effective January 21, 2022.

5.138.
Thirty-eighth Senatorial District.

The Thirty-eighth Senatorial District shall consist of the following territory:

County: Bullitt KY

County: Jefferson KY (part)

B134 - Precinct 134 29 District

B173 - Precinct 173 29 District

B175 - Precinct 175 29 District

B177 - Precinct 177 29 District (part)

211110116032047, 211110116032048, 211110116032049, 211110116032050, 211110117094001, 211110117094002, 211110117094003, 211110117094004, 211110117094005, 211110117094006, 211110117094007, 211110117094008, 211110117094010, 211110117094011, 211110117094012, 211110117094013, 211110117094014, 211110117094015, 211110117094016

Click to view

H145 - Precinct 145 35 District

H162 - Precinct 162 35 District

I133 - Precinct 133 37 District

I135 - Precinct 135 37 District

I141 - Precinct 141 37 District

I143 - Precinct 143 37 District

I144 - Precinct 144 37 District

I145 - Precinct 145 37 District

I146 - Precinct 146 37 District

I147 - Precinct 147 37 District

I148 - Precinct 148 37 District

I152 - Precinct 152 37 District

I153 - Precinct 153 37 District

I154 - Precinct 154 37 District

J123 - Precinct 123 38 District (part)

211110120031001, 211110120031002, 211110120031003, 211110120031004, 211110120032019

Click to view

J141 - Precinct 141 38 District

J155 - Precinct 155 38 District

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1991 (2d Ex. Sess.), ch. 3, § 38, effective January 8, 1992; repealed and reenact., Acts 1995 (3d Ex. Sess.), ch. 5, §
38, effective November 3, 1995; repealed and reenact., Acts 1996, ch. 2, §
38, effective January 11, 1996; repealed and reenact., Acts 2002, ch. 1, § 138, effective January 31, 2002; repealed and reenact., Acts 2013 (1st Ex. Sess.), ch. 1, § 38, effective August 23, 2013; repealed and reenacted by 2022 ch. 9, § 38, effective January 21, 2022.